Washington statutes.
RCW 35.61.240

Assessment lien—Collection.

The assessment for local improvements authorized by this chapter shall become a lien in the same manner, and be governed by the same law, as is provided for local assessments in cities of the first class and be collected as such assessments are collected.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.61.240. Prior: 1943 c 264 s 17; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6741-17; prior: 1907 c 98 s 18; RRS s 6737.]

NOTES:

Collection and foreclosure of assessments: Chapters 35.49, 35.50 RCW.